Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB676.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 9 TLSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh S.F. _____ H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 CONSOLIDATION OF CHARTER SCHOOL CODE CHAPTERS AND ELIMINATION 2 OF INNOVATION ZONE SCHOOLS 3 Section 1. Section 29E.1, subsection 1, paragraph b, 4 subparagraph (4), Code 2026, is amended by striking the 5 subparagraph. 6 Sec. 2. Section 232E.1, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 6. âPublic school districtâ means a public school district 9 as described in chapter 274 , and includes a charter school 10 under chapter 256E , or a charter school or an innovation zone 11 school under chapter 256F . 12 Sec. 3. Section 256.7, subsection 15, Code 2026, is amended 13 to read as follows: 14 15. Adopt rules under chapter 17A that require school 15 districts, accredited nonpublic schools, and charter schools , 16 and innovation zone schools to include information regarding 17 the exemptions and requirements for an exemption described 18 in section 139A.8, subsection 4 , in any communication to 19 the parent or guardian of a student that is related to the 20 immunizations required under section 139A.8 . 21 Sec. 4. Section 256.9, subsections 69, 71, 73, and 78, Code 22 2026, are amended to read as follows: 23 69. On or before May 1, 2025, develop and distribute to 24 school districts, accredited nonpublic schools, and charter 25 schools , and innovation zone schools model policies that, if 26 adopted, would satisfy a school districtâs responsibilities 27 under section 279.88 relating to policies governing student use 28 of personal electronic devices. 29 71. Develop and distribute to school districts, accredited 30 nonpublic schools, and charter schools , and innovation 31 zone schools family-centered resources to support student 32 development of mathematics knowledge at home. 33 73. On or before July 1, 2025, develop and distribute to 34 school districts, accredited nonpublic schools, and charter 35 -1- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 1/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ schools , and innovation zone schools a comprehensive state 1 mathematics plan that is designed to increase the level of 2 mathematics proficiency attained by students using systematic 3 and sequential approaches to teaching subitizing, cardinality, 4 object counting, verbal counting, spatial relationships, 5 benchmark numbers, and part-part-whole models. 6 78. a. Develop and distribute to school districts, 7 accredited nonpublic schools, and charter schools , and 8 innovation zone schools a test in multiple-choice format that 9 consists of all of the questions contained in the most recent 10 version of the civics test developed by the United States 11 citizenship and immigration services. 12 b. On or before the January 31 immediately subsequent to 13 each general election which is a presidential election, update 14 the test described in paragraph âaâ and distribute the updated 15 test to school districts, accredited nonpublic schools, and 16 charter schools , and innovation zone schools . 17 Sec. 5. Section 256E.1, subsection 3, unnumbered paragraph 18 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 19 The purpose of a charter school established pursuant to this 20 chapter subchapter shall be to accomplish the following: 21 Sec. 6. Section 256E.1, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 22 to read as follows: 23 4. The state board of education shall be the only authorizer 24 of charter schools under this chapter subchapter . 25 Sec. 7. Section 256E.2, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, 26 is amended to read as follows: 27 As used in this chapter subchapter , unless the context 28 otherwise requires: 29 Sec. 8. Section 256E.2, subsections 2 and 5, Code 2026, are 30 amended to read as follows: 31 2. âCharter schoolâ means a school established in accordance 32 with this chapter subchapter . 33 5. âFounding groupâ means a person, group of persons, 34 or education service provider that develops and submits an 35 -2- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 2/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ application for a charter school to the state board under this 1 chapter subchapter . 2 Sec. 9. Section 256E.3, Code 2026, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 256E.3 Department ââ duty to monitor. 5 The department shall monitor the effectiveness of charter 6 schools and shall implement the applicable provisions of this 7 chapter subchapter . 8 Sec. 10. Section 256E.4, subsection 8, Code 2026, is amended 9 to read as follows: 10 8. The state board shall approve a charter school 11 application if the application satisfies the requirements of 12 this chapter subchapter . The state board shall approve or 13 deny a charter school application no later than seventy-five 14 calendar days after the application is received. If the state 15 board denies an application, the state board shall provide 16 notice of denial to the founding group in writing within 17 thirty days after the state boardâs action. The notice shall 18 specify the exact reasons for denial and provide documentation 19 supporting those reasons. An approval decision may include, if 20 appropriate, reasonable conditions that the founding group must 21 meet before a charter school contract may be executed pursuant 22 to section 256E.6 . An approved charter application shall not 23 serve as a charter school contract. 24 Sec. 11. Section 256E.5, subsection 8, Code 2026, is amended 25 to read as follows: 26 8. The state board shall approve a charter school 27 application if the application satisfies the requirements of 28 this chapter subchapter . The state board shall approve or 29 deny a charter school application no later than seventy-five 30 calendar days after the application is received. If the state 31 board denies an application, the state board shall provide 32 notice of denial to the applicant in writing within thirty 33 days after board action. The notice shall specify the exact 34 reasons for denial and provide documentation supporting those 35 -3- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 3/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ reasons. An approval decision may include, if appropriate, 1 reasonable conditions that the applicant must meet before a 2 charter school contract may be executed pursuant to section 3 256E.6 . An approved charter application shall not serve as a 4 charter school contract. 5 Sec. 12. Section 256E.6, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 6 to read as follows: 7 5. A charter school approved under this chapter subchapter 8 shall not commence operations without a valid charter school 9 contract executed in accordance with this section and approved 10 in an open session of the state board. 11 Sec. 13. Section 256E.7, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 12 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 13 In order to fulfill the charter schoolâs public purpose, a 14 charter school established under this chapter subchapter shall 15 be organized as a nonprofit education organization and shall 16 have all the powers necessary for carrying out the terms of 17 the charter school contract including but not limited to the 18 following, as applicable: 19 Sec. 14. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, unnumbered paragraph 20 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 21 A charter school established under this chapter subchapter 22 is exempt from all state statutes and rules and any local rule, 23 regulation, or policy, applicable to a noncharter school, 24 except that the charter school shall do all of the following: 25 Sec. 15. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph w, Code 26 2026, is amended to read as follows: 27 w. Comply with the requirements of this chapter subchapter . 28 Sec. 16. Section 256E.8, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 29 to read as follows: 30 1. Each student enrolled in a charter school established 31 under this chapter subchapter shall be counted, for state 32 school foundation purposes, in the studentâs district of 33 residence pursuant to section 257.6, subsection 1 , paragraph 34 âaâ , subparagraph (9), including any applicable amounts under 35 -4- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 4/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ section 256B.9 . For purposes of this section , residence means 1 a residence under section 282.1 . 2 Sec. 17. Section 256E.9, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 5. Each charter school established under this chapter 5 subchapter shall be evaluated and graded by the department 6 pursuant to the attendance center performance ranking system 7 developed and adopted by the department. 8 Sec. 18. Section 256E.10, subsections 1, 6, and 13, Code 9 2026, are amended to read as follows: 10 1. The state board shall monitor the performance and 11 compliance of each charter school the state board approves, 12 including collecting and analyzing data according to the 13 charter school contract in order to meet the requirements 14 of this chapter subchapter . Such oversight may include 15 inquiries and investigation of the charter school so long as 16 the activities are consistent with the intent of this chapter 17 subchapter , adhere to the terms of the charter school contract, 18 and do not unduly inhibit the autonomy granted to the charter 19 school. Any performance report resulting from an inquiry or 20 investigation under this section shall, upon conclusion of such 21 action, be included in the annual report required under section 22 256E.12 . 23 6. Annually, by June 30, the state board shall issue a 24 charter school performance report and charter school contract 25 renewal application guidance to each charter school whose 26 charter school contract will expire during the following school 27 budget year. The performance report shall summarize the 28 charter schoolâs performance record to date based on the data 29 required by the charter school contract and by this chapter 30 subchapter and shall identify concerns that may jeopardize 31 renewal of the charter school contract if not remedied. 32 The charter school shall have sixty days to respond to the 33 performance report and submit any corrections or clarifications 34 for the report. 35 -5- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 5/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 13. If a charter school has been evaluated and graded to 1 be in the exceptional category, or the highest rated category 2 under a succeeding evaluation system, under the evaluation and 3 grading required under section 256E.9, subsection 5 , for the 4 immediately preceding two school years, and the charter school 5 is in compliance with the current charter school contract and 6 all provisions of this chapter subchapter , the charter schoolâs 7 application renewal under subsection 8 shall be renewed for an 8 additional period of time equal to the length of the original 9 charter school contract or the most recent renewal of the 10 contract, whichever is longer, unless the state board provides 11 written notice to the charter school of the state boardâs 12 rejection of the expedited renewal within sixty days of the 13 filing of the application. The state board shall not reject 14 an expedited renewal application unless the state board finds 15 exceptional circumstances for the rejection or seeks material 16 changes to the charter school contract. 17 Sec. 19. Section 256E.10, subsection 10, paragraph a, Code 18 2026, is amended to read as follows: 19 a. Committed a material violation of any of the terms, 20 conditions, standards, or procedures required under the charter 21 school contract or this chapter subchapter . 22 Sec. 20. Section 256E.11, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 23 amended to read as follows: 24 1. Prior to any charter school closure decision, the state 25 board shall develop a charter school closure protocol to ensure 26 timely notice to parents and guardians, provide for the orderly 27 transition of students and student records to new schools, and 28 to provide proper disposition of school funds, property, and 29 assets in accordance with the requirements of this chapter 30 subchapter . The protocol shall specify required actions and 31 timelines and identify responsible parties for each such 32 action. 33 Sec. 21. Section 256E.12, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 34 amended to read as follows: 35 -6- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 6/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 2. The state board shall prepare and file with the general 1 assembly by December 1, annually, a comprehensive report 2 with findings and recommendations relating to the charter 3 school program in the state and whether the charter school 4 program under this chapter subchapter is meeting the goals and 5 purposes of the program. The report also shall contain, for 6 each charter school, a copy of the charter schoolâs mission 7 statement, attendance statistics and dropout rate, aggregate 8 assessment test scores, projections of financial stability, and 9 the number and qualifications of teachers and administrators. 10 Sec. 22. Section 256F.1, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 11 to read as follows: 12 1. Charter schools and innovation zone schools shall be part 13 of the stateâs program of public education. 14 Sec. 23. Section 256F.1, subsection 3, unnumbered paragraph 15 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 16 The purpose of a charter school or an innovation zone school 17 established pursuant to this chapter subchapter shall be to 18 accomplish the following: 19 Sec. 24. Section 256F.1, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 20 by striking the subsection. 21 Sec. 25. Section 256F.2, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, 22 is amended to read as follows: 23 As used in this chapter subchapter , unless the context 24 otherwise requires: 25 Sec. 26. Section 256F.2, subsections 1 and 3, Code 2026, are 26 amended to read as follows: 27 1. âAdvisory councilâ means a council appointed by the 28 school board of directors of a charter school or an innovation 29 zone consortium pursuant to section 256F.5, subsection 4 . 30 3. âCharter schoolâ means a charter school established in 31 accordance with this chapter subchapter . 32 Sec. 27. Section 256F.2, subsections 5 and 6, Code 2026, are 33 amended by striking the subsections. 34 Sec. 28. Section 256F.3, Code 2026, is amended to read as 35 -7- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 7/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ follows: 1 256F.3 Application Monitoring ââ no new approvals ââ adoption 2 of rules . 3 1. The department shall monitor the effectiveness of 4 charter schools and innovation zone schools and shall implement 5 the applicable provisions of this chapter subchapter . 6 2. a. To receive approval to establish a charter school 7 in accordance with this chapter , the principal, teachers, 8 or parents or guardians of students at an existing public 9 school shall submit an application to the school board to 10 convert an existing attendance center to a charter school. 11 An attendance center shall not enter into a charter school 12 contract with a school district under this chapter unless the 13 attendance center is located within the school district. The 14 application shall demonstrate the support of at least fifty 15 percent of the teachers employed at the school on the date of 16 the submission of the application and fifty percent of the 17 parents or guardians voting whose children are enrolled at the 18 school, provided that a majority of the parents or guardians 19 eligible to vote participate in the ballot process, according 20 to procedures established by rules of the state board. 21 b. To receive approval to establish an innovation zone 22 school in accordance with this chapter , an innovation zone 23 consortium shall submit an application to the state board 24 which demonstrates the support of at least fifty percent of 25 the teachers employed at each proposed innovation zone school 26 on the date of the submission of the application and fifty 27 percent of the parents or guardians voting whose children are 28 enrolled at each proposed innovation zone school, provided 29 that a majority of the parents or guardians eligible to vote 30 participate in the ballot process, according to procedures 31 established by rules of the state board. 32 c. A parent or guardian voting in accordance with this 33 subsection must be a resident of this state. 34 3. A school board shall receive and review all applications 35 -8- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 8/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ for converting an existing building or creating a new building 1 for a charter school. Applications received on or before 2 October 1 of a calendar year shall be considered for charter 3 schools to be established at the beginning of the school 4 districtâs next school year or at a time agreed to by the 5 applicant and the school board. However, a school board may 6 receive and consider applications after October 1 at its 7 discretion. 8 4. A school board shall by a majority vote approve or 9 deny an application relating to a charter school no later 10 than sixty calendar days after the application is received. 11 An application approved by a school board and subsequently 12 approved by the state board pursuant to subsection 6 shall 13 constitute, at a minimum, an agreement between the school board 14 and the charter school for the operation of the charter school. 15 A school board that denies an application for a conversion 16 to a charter school shall provide notice of denial to the 17 applicant in writing within thirty days after board action. 18 The notice shall specify the exact reasons for denial and 19 provide documentation supporting those reasons. 20 5. An applicant may appeal school board denial of the 21 applicantâs charter school application to the state board 22 in accordance with the procedures set forth in chapter 290 . 23 The state board shall affirm, modify, or reverse the school 24 boardâs decision on the basis of the information provided in 25 the application indicating the ability and willingness of the 26 proposed charter school to meet the requirements of section 27 256F.1, subsection 3 , and section 256F.4 . 28 6. Upon approval of an application for the proposed 29 establishment of a charter school, the school board shall 30 submit an application for approval to establish the charter 31 school to the state board in accordance with section 256F.5 . 32 7. An application submitted to the state board pursuant to 33 subsection 2 , paragraph âbâ , or subsection 6 shall set forth the 34 manner in which the charter school or innovation zone school 35 -9- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 9/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ will provide special instruction, in accordance with section 1 280.4 , to students who are English learners. The application 2 shall set forth the manner in which the charter school or 3 innovation zone school will comply with federal and state laws 4 and regulations relating to the federal National School Lunch 5 Act and the federal Child Nutrition Act of 1966 , 42 U.S.C. 6 Â§1751 â 1785 , and chapter 283A . The state board shall approve 7 only those applications that meet the requirements specified in 8 section 256F.1, subsection 3 , and sections 256F.4 and 256F.5 . 9 The state board may deny an application if the state board 10 deems that approval of the application is not in the best 11 interest of the affected students. 12 8. The state board shall approve not more than ten 13 innovation zone consortium applications. 14 9. 2. The state board shall not approve a new charter 15 school under this chapter subchapter on or after July 1, 2021. 16 10. 3. The state board shall adopt rules in accordance with 17 chapter 17A for the implementation of this chapter subchapter . 18 If federal rules or regulations relating to the distribution 19 or utilization of federal funds allocated to the department 20 pursuant to this section are adopted that are inconsistent 21 with the provisions of this chapter subchapter , the state 22 board shall adopt rules to comply with the requirements of the 23 federal rules or regulations. The state board shall identify 24 inconsistencies between federal and state rules and regulations 25 as provided in this subsection and shall submit recommendations 26 for legislative action to the chairpersons and ranking members 27 of the senate and house standing committees on education at the 28 next meeting of the general assembly. 29 Sec. 29. Section 256F.4, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 30 by striking the subsection. 31 Sec. 30. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, unnumbered paragraph 32 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 33 Although a charter school or innovation zone school may 34 elect to comply with one or more provisions of statute or 35 -10- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 10/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ administrative rule, a charter school or innovation zone school 1 is exempt from all statutes and rules applicable to a school, 2 a school board, or a school district, except that the charter 3 school or innovation zone school shall do all of the following: 4 Sec. 31. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, paragraphs a and h, 5 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 6 a. Meet all applicable federal, state, and local health and 7 safety requirements and laws prohibiting discrimination on the 8 basis of race, creed, color, sex, sexual orientation, national 9 origin, religion, ancestry, or disability. A charter school 10 or innovation zone school located within the boundaries of a 11 school district subject to court-ordered desegregation at the 12 time the charter school or innovation zone school application 13 is approved shall be subject to the desegregation order unless 14 otherwise specifically provided for in the desegregation order. 15 h. Be subject to and comply with chapter 284 relating to 16 the student achievement and teacher quality program. A charter 17 school or innovation zone school that complies with chapter 18 284 shall receive state moneys or be eligible to receive state 19 moneys calculated as provided in section 257.10, subsections 20 9 and 10 , and section 257.37A as if it did not operate under a 21 charter school or innovation zone school contract. 22 Sec. 32. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 23 by adding the following new paragraph: 24 NEW PARAGRAPH . v. Be subject to and comply with the 25 requirements of section 256E.9 related to the incorporation 26 into the charter school contract of a performance framework 27 that is used by the state board to evaluate the charter school 28 in the same manner as a charter school established under 29 subchapter I. 30 Sec. 33. Section 256F.4, subsections 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, and 8, 31 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 32 3. A charter school or innovation zone school shall not 33 discriminate in its student admissions policies or practices 34 on the basis of intellectual or athletic ability, measures 35 -11- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 11/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ of achievement or aptitude, or status as a person with a 1 disability. However, a charter school or innovation zone 2 school may limit admission to students who are within a 3 particular range of ages or grade levels or on any other 4 basis that would be legal if initiated by a school district. 5 Enrollment priority shall be given to the siblings of students 6 enrolled in a charter school or innovation zone school . 7 4. A charter school or innovation zone school shall 8 enroll an eligible resident student who submits a timely 9 application unless the number of applications exceeds the 10 capacity of a program, class, grade level, or building. In 11 this case, students must be accepted by lot. A charter school 12 or innovation zone school may enroll an eligible nonresident 13 student who submits a timely application in accordance with 14 the student admission policy established pursuant to section 15 256F.5, subsection 1 . If the charter school or innovation zone 16 school enrolls an eligible nonresident student, the charter 17 school or innovation zone school shall notify the school 18 district of residence and the sending district not later than 19 March 1 of the preceding school year. Transportation for the 20 student shall be in accordance with section 282.18, subsection 21 10 . The sending district shall make payments to the charter 22 school or innovation zone consortium in the manner required 23 under section 282.18, subsection 7 . If the nonresident pupil 24 is also an eligible pupil under section 261E.6 , the innovation 25 zone consortium shall pay the tuition reimbursement amount to 26 an eligible postsecondary institution as provided in section 27 261E.7 . 28 5. A charter school or innovation zone school shall provide 29 instruction for at least the number of days or hours required 30 by section 279.10, subsection 1 . 31 6. Notwithstanding subsection 2 , a charter school or 32 innovation zone school shall meet the requirements of section 33 256.7, subsection 21 . 34 7. a. A charter school shall be considered a part of the 35 -12- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 12/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ school district in which it is located for purposes of state 1 school foundation aid pursuant to chapter 257 . 2 b. Students enrolled in an innovation zone school shall 3 be counted, for state school foundation aid purposes, in the 4 studentâs district of residence. 5 8. A charter school or innovation zone consortium may enter 6 into contracts in accordance with chapter 26 . 7 Sec. 34. Section 256F.5, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, 8 is amended to read as follows: 9 An application to the state board for the approval of a 10 charter school or innovation zone school shall include but 11 shall not be limited to a description of the following: 12 Sec. 35. Section 256F.5, subsections 1, 2, 4, 6, 7, 10, 13 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, and 17, Code 2026, are amended to read as 14 follows: 15 1. The method for admission to the charter school or 16 innovation zone school . 17 2. The mission, purpose, innovation, and specialized focus 18 of the charter school or innovation zone school . 19 4. The method for appointing or forming an advisory 20 council for the charter school or innovation zone school . 21 The membership of an advisory council appointed or formed in 22 accordance with this chapter subchapter shall not include more 23 than one member of a participating school board. 24 6. The charter school or innovation zone school governance 25 and bylaws. 26 7. The financial plan for the operation of the charter 27 school or innovation zone school including, at a minimum, 28 a listing of the support services the school district or 29 innovation zone consortium will provide, and the charter 30 school or innovation zone schoolâs revenues, budgets, and 31 expenditures. 32 10. The organization of the charter school or innovation 33 zone school in terms of ages of students or grades to be taught 34 along with an estimate of the total enrollment of the charter 35 -13- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 13/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ school or innovation zone school . 1 12. A statement indicating how the charter school or 2 innovation zone school will meet the requirements of section 3 256F.1, as applicable; section 256F.4, subsection 2 , paragraph 4 âaâ ; and section 256F.4, subsection 3 . 5 13. Assurance of the assumption of liability by the charter 6 school or the innovation zone consortium for the innovation 7 zone school . 8 14. The types and amounts of insurance coverage to be 9 obtained by the charter school or innovation zone consortium 10 for the innovation zone school . 11 15. A plan of operation to be implemented if the charter 12 school or innovation zone consortium revokes or fails to renew 13 its contract. 14 16. The means, costs, and plan for providing transportation 15 for students enrolled in the charter school or innovation zone 16 school . 17 17. The specific statutes, administrative rules, and school 18 board policies with which the charter school or innovation zone 19 school does not intend to comply. 20 Sec. 36. Section 256F.6, subsections 1 and 3, Code 2026, are 21 amended to read as follows: 22 1. a. An approved charter school or innovation zone school 23 application shall constitute an agreement, the terms of which 24 shall, at a minimum, be the terms of a four-year five-year 25 enforceable, renewable contract between a school board , or the 26 boards participating in an innovation zone consortium, and the 27 state board. The contract shall include an operating agreement 28 for the operation of the charter school or innovation zone 29 school. The terms of the contract may be revised at any time 30 with the approval of both the state board and the school board 31 or the boards participating in the innovation zone consortium , 32 whether or not the stated provisions of the contract are being 33 fulfilled. The contract must include all of the following: 34 (1) An operating agreement for the operation of the charter 35 -14- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 14/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ school. 1 (2) A performance framework as required under section 2 256F.4, subsection 2, paragraph âvâ . 3 b. A contract may be renewed by agreement of the school 4 board or the boards participating in an innovation zone 5 consortium, as applicable, and the state board. 6 c. The charter school or innovation zone consortium shall 7 provide parents and guardians of students enrolled in the 8 charter school or innovation zone school with a copy of the 9 charter school or innovation zone school application approved 10 pursuant to section 256F.5 . 11 3. The state board of education shall provide by rule for 12 the ongoing review of each partyâs compliance with a contract 13 entered into in accordance with this chapter subchapter . 14 Sec. 37. Section 256F.7, Code 2026, is amended to read as 15 follows: 16 256F.7 Employment and related matters. 17 1. A charter school or the boards participating in an 18 innovation zone consortium shall employ or contract with 19 necessary teachers and administrators, as defined in section 20 256.145 , who hold a valid license with an endorsement for the 21 type of service for which the teacher or administrator is 22 employed. 23 2. The school board or innovation zone consortium, as 24 specified in the application , in consultation with the advisory 25 council, shall decide matters related to the operation of the 26 charter school or innovation zone school , including budgeting, 27 curriculum, and operating procedures. 28 3. a. Employees of a charter school shall be considered 29 employees of the school district. 30 b. Employees of an innovation zone school shall be 31 considered employees of a board participating in the innovation 32 zone consortium. 33 Sec. 38. Section 256F.8, subsections 1, 2, 3, 4, and 6, Code 34 2026, are amended to read as follows: 35 -15- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 15/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 1. A contract for the establishment of a charter school or 1 innovation zone school may be revoked by the state board , or 2 the school board that established the charter school , or the 3 innovation zone consortium that established the innovation zone 4 school if the appropriate board or consortium determines that 5 one or more of the following occurred: 6 a. Failure of the charter school or innovation zone school 7 to abide by and meet the provisions set forth in the contract, 8 including educational goals. 9 b. Failure of the charter school or innovation zone school 10 to comply with all applicable law. 11 c. Failure of the charter school or innovation zone school 12 to meet generally accepted public sector accounting principles. 13 d. The existence of one or more other grounds for revocation 14 as specified in the contract. 15 e. Assessment of student progress, which is administered 16 in accordance with state and locally determined indicators 17 established pursuant to rules adopted by the state board, 18 does not show improvement in student progress over that 19 which existed in the same student population prior to the 20 establishment of the charter school or the innovation zone 21 school . 22 2. The decision by a school board or an innovation zone 23 consortium to revoke or to fail to take action to renew a 24 charter school or innovation zone school contract is subject to 25 appeal under procedures set forth in chapter 290 . 26 3. A school board or a board participating in an innovation 27 zone consortium that is considering revocation or nonrenewal 28 of a charter school or innovation zone school contract shall 29 notify the advisory council, the parents or guardians of the 30 students enrolled in the charter school or innovation zone 31 school , and the teachers and administrators employed by the 32 charter school or innovation zone school , sixty days prior to 33 revoking or the date by which the contract must be renewed, but 34 not later than the last day of classes in the school year. 35 -16- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 16/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 4. If the state board determines that a charter school or 1 innovation zone school is in substantial violation of the terms 2 of the contract, the state board shall notify the school board 3 or innovation zone consortium and the advisory council of its 4 intention to revoke the contract at least sixty days prior to 5 revoking a contract and the school board or the school boards 6 participating in the innovation zone consortium shall assume 7 oversight authority, operational authority, or both oversight 8 and operational authority. The notice shall state the 9 grounds for the proposed action in writing and in reasonable 10 detail. The school board or innovation zone consortium may 11 request in writing an informal hearing before the state board 12 within fourteen days of receiving notice of revocation of 13 the contract. Upon receiving a timely written request for a 14 hearing, the state board shall give reasonable notice to the 15 school board or innovation zone consortium of the hearing 16 date. The state board shall conduct an informal hearing before 17 taking final action. Final action to revoke a contract shall 18 be taken in a manner least disruptive to students enrolled in 19 the charter school or innovation zone school . The state board 20 shall take final action to revoke or approve continuation of 21 a contract by the last day of classes in the school year. If 22 the final action to revoke a contract under this section occurs 23 prior to the last day of classes in the school year, a charter 24 school or innovation zone school student may enroll in the 25 resident district. 26 6. A school board revoking a contract or a school board , 27 innovation zone consortium, or advisory council that fails to 28 renew a contract under this chapter subchapter is not liable 29 for that action to the charter school or innovation zone 30 school , a student enrolled in the charter school or innovation 31 zone school or the studentâs parent or guardian, or any other 32 person. 33 Sec. 39. Section 256F.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as 34 follows: 35 -17- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 17/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 256F.9 Procedures after revocation ââ student enrollment. 1 If a charter school or innovation zone school contract 2 is revoked in accordance with this chapter subchapter , a 3 nonresident student who attended the school, and any siblings 4 of the student may submit an application to another school 5 district according to section 282.18 . Applications and notices 6 required by section 282.18 shall be processed and provided in a 7 prompt manner. 8 Sec. 40. Section 256F.10, Code 2026, is amended to read as 9 follows: 10 256F.10 Reports. 11 1. A charter school or innovation zone school shall 12 report at least annually to the school board or innovation 13 zone consortium , advisory council, and the state board the 14 information required by the school board or innovation zone 15 consortium , advisory council, or the state board. The reports 16 are public records subject to chapter 22 . 17 2. Not later than December 1 annually, the state board shall 18 submit a comprehensive report with findings and recommendations 19 to the general assembly. The report shall evaluate the stateâs 20 charter school and innovation zone school programs generally, 21 including but not limited to an evaluation of whether the 22 charter schools and innovation zone schools are fulfilling the 23 purposes set forth in section 256F.4, subsection 2 . The report 24 also shall contain, for each charter school or innovation 25 zone school , a copy of the charter school or innovation 26 zone schoolâs mission statement, attendance statistics and 27 dropout rate, aggregate assessment test scores, projections of 28 financial stability, the number and qualifications of teachers 29 and administrators, and number of and comments on supervisory 30 visits by the department of education. 31 Sec. 41. Section 256F.12, Code 2026, is amended to read as 32 follows: 33 256F.12 Operation of existing charter schools. 34 Charter schools established under this chapter subchapter 35 -18- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 18/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ prior to July 1, 2021, shall continue to operate under and be 1 subject to the requirements of this chapter subchapter and 2 shall not be subject to chapter 256E subchapter I . 3 Sec. 42. Section 257.6, subsection 1, paragraph a, 4 subparagraph (9), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5 (9) Resident pupils enrolled in a charter school under 6 chapter 256E or 256F . 7 Sec. 43. Section 280.36, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 8 to read as follows: 9 3. The board of directors of a school district or the 10 authorities in charge of an accredited nonpublic school 11 may enter into an agreement with another school district, 12 accredited nonpublic school, or charter school , or innovation 13 zone school to create a multidisciplinary school safety 14 assessment team that shall coordinate resources among the 15 schools and assess and intervene when a student enrolled in 16 either school exhibits behavior that may pose a threat to 17 the safety of either school, employees of either school, or 18 students enrolled in either school. 19 Sec. 44. Section 282.9, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 20 to read as follows: 21 1. Notwithstanding sections 256E.7 , 256F.4 256E.23 , 22 275.55A , and 282.18 , or any other provision to the contrary, 23 prior to knowingly enrolling an individual who is required 24 to register as a sex offender under chapter 692A , but who is 25 otherwise eligible to enroll in a public school, the board of 26 directors of a school district shall determine the educational 27 placement of the individual. Upon receipt of notice that a 28 student who is enrolled in the district is required to register 29 as a sex offender under chapter 692A , the board shall determine 30 the educational placement of the student. The tentative agenda 31 for the meeting of the board of directors at which the board 32 will consider such enrollment or educational placement shall 33 specifically state that the board is considering the enrollment 34 or educational placement of an individual who is required 35 -19- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 19/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ to register as a sex offender under chapter 692A . If the 1 individual is denied enrollment in a school district under this 2 section , the school district of residence shall provide the 3 individual with educational services in an alternative setting. 4 Sec. 45. Section 282.18, subsection 11, paragraph a, 5 subparagraph (8), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 6 (8) If the pupil participates in open enrollment because 7 of circumstances that meet the definition of good cause. For 8 purposes of this section , âgood causeâ means a change in a 9 childâs residence due to a change in family residence, a change 10 in a childâs residence from the residence of one parent or 11 guardian to the residence of a different parent or guardian, a 12 change in the state in which the family residence is located, 13 a change in a childâs parentsâ marital status, a guardianship 14 or custody proceeding, placement in foster care, adoption, 15 participation in a foreign exchange program, initial placement 16 of a prekindergarten student in a special education program 17 requiring specially designed instruction, or participation in 18 a substance use disorder or mental health treatment program, 19 a change in the status of a childâs resident district such 20 as removal of accreditation by the state board, surrender of 21 accreditation, or permanent closure of a nonpublic school, 22 revocation of a charter school contract as provided in section 23 256E.10 or 256F.8 256E.27 , the failure of negotiations for a 24 whole grade sharing, reorganization, dissolution agreement, or 25 the rejection of a current whole grade sharing agreement, or 26 reorganization plan. 27 Sec. 46. Section 297.24, subsection 3, paragraph d, Code 28 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 29 Sec. 47. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE ââ TRANSFERS ââ NEW 30 SUBCHAPTERS. 31 1. The Code editor is directed to make the following 32 transfers: 33 a. Section 256F.1 to section 256E.20. 34 b. Section 256F.2 to section 256E.21. 35 -20- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 20/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ c. Section 256F.3 to section 256E.22. 1 d. Section 256F.4 to section 256E.23. 2 e. Section 256F.5 to section 256E.24. 3 f. Section 256F.6 to section 256E.25. 4 g. Section 256F.7 to section 256E.26. 5 h. Section 256F.8 to section 256E.27. 6 i. Section 256F.9 to section 256E.28. 7 j. Section 256F.10 to section 256E.29. 8 k. Section 256F.12 to section 256E.30. 9 2. The Code editor is directed to create two new subchapters 10 in chapter 256E as follows: 11 a. Subchapter I shall be entitled âCharter Schoolsâ and 12 include sections 256E.1 through 256E.13. 13 b. Subchapter II shall be entitled âLegacy Charter Schoolsâ 14 and include sections 256E.20 through 256E.30. 15 3. The Code editor is directed to make changes in any Code 16 sections or other noncodified enactments amended or enacted 17 by any other Act to correspond with the changes made in this 18 Act if there appears to be no doubt as to the proper method of 19 making the changes and the changes would not be contrary to or 20 inconsistent with the purposes of this Act or any other Act. 21 Sec. 48. APPLICABILITY. The following apply to charter 22 school contracts entered into under section 256F.6 between a 23 school board and the state board of education that are renewed 24 on or after the effective date of this division of this Act: 25 1. The section of this division of this Act amending 26 section 256F.4, subsection 2, by requiring charter schools to 27 incorporate a performance framework into the charter school 28 contract. 29 2. The section of this division of this Act amending section 30 256F.6, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ. 31 DIVISION II 32 FUNDING AND AREA EDUCATION AGENCY SERVICES 33 Sec. 49. Section 256E.8, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 34 2026, is amended to read as follows: 35 -21- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 21/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ a. The charter school in which the student is enrolled 1 shall receive under paragraph âcâ an amount equal to the sum 2 of the regular program state cost per pupil for the budget 3 year plus the teacher leadership supplement state cost per 4 pupil, the teacher salary supplement state cost per pupil, the 5 professional development supplement state cost per pupil, and 6 the early intervention supplement state cost per pupil for 7 the budget year as provided in section 257.9 plus any moneys 8 that would be due to the school district of residence for the 9 student as a result of the non-English speaking weighting under 10 section 280.4, subsection 3 , for the budget year multiplied by 11 the state cost per pupil for the budget year. If a student 12 is an eligible pupil under section 261E.6 , the charter school 13 shall pay the tuition reimbursement amount to an eligible 14 postsecondary institution as provided in section 261E.7 . 15 Sec. 50. Section 257.35, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 16 following new subsection: 17 NEW SUBSECTION . 21A. The director of the department of 18 management may deduct the following from the state aid due to 19 each school district pursuant to this chapter and shall pay 20 the amounts to the respective area education agencies on a 21 monthly basis from September 15 through June 15 during each 22 school year for purposes of providing services to students 23 enrolled in charter schools established pursuant to chapter 24 256E, subchapter I, within the boundaries of the area education 25 agency: 26 a. The amount calculated for media services for the school 27 district that is attributable to the number of students 28 enrolled in charter schools established pursuant to chapter 29 256E, subchapter I, within the school district who are provided 30 with media services by an area education agency. 31 b. The amount calculated for educational services for the 32 school district that is attributable to the number of students 33 enrolled in charter schools established pursuant to chapter 34 256E, subchapter I, within the school district who are provided 35 -22- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 22/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ with educational services by an area education agency. 1 Sec. 51. Section 273.2, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 2 2026, is amended to read as follows: 3 a. The area education agency shall furnish educational 4 services and programs as provided in section 273.1 , this 5 section , sections 273.3 through 273.8 , and chapter 256B to 6 pupils enrolled in public or nonpublic schools which are on 7 the list of accredited schools pursuant to section 256.11 , and 8 to pupils enrolled in charter schools established pursuant 9 to chapter 256E, subchapter I, which request to receive such 10 services. The programs and services provided shall be at least 11 commensurate with programs and services existing on July 1, 12 1974. The programs and services provided to pupils enrolled 13 in nonpublic schools shall be comparable to programs and 14 services provided to pupils enrolled in public schools within 15 constitutional guidelines. 16 Sec. 52. Section 273.2, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 17 to read as follows: 18 4. The area education agency shall provide for special 19 education services and media services for school districts 20 and shall encourage and assist school districts to establish 21 programs for gifted and talented children. The area education 22 agency shall provide for media services for charter schools 23 established pursuant to chapter 256E, subchapter I. The area 24 education agency shall assist in facilitating interlibrary 25 loans of materials between school districts and other 26 libraries. 27 Sec. 53. APPLICABILITY. The following apply to school 28 budget years beginning on or after July 1, 2026: 29 1. The section of this division of this Act amending section 30 256E.8, subsection 2, paragraph âaâ. 31 2. The section of this division of this Act amending section 32 257.35. 33 DIVISION III 34 EXTRACURRICULAR INTERSCHOLASTIC ATHLETIC CONTESTS OR 35 -23- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 23/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ COMPETITIONS PROVIDED BY PUBLIC SCHOOLS 1 Sec. 54. Section 280.13D, Code 2026, is amended to read as 2 follows: 3 280.13D Participation in extracurricular interscholastic 4 athletic contests or competitions provided by public schools. 5 1. a. The board of directors of a school district shall 6 allow a student who resides within the school district, and 7 who is enrolled in a nonpublic school or a charter school 8 established pursuant to chapter 256E, subchapter I , to 9 participate in any extracurricular interscholastic athletic 10 contest or competition that is provided by the school district 11 pursuant to the terms of an agreement between the board of 12 directors of the school district and the authorities in charge 13 of the nonpublic school or the governing board of the charter 14 school, as applicable, that provides for the eligibility of the 15 student, if all of the following criteria are satisfied: 16 (1) The extracurricular interscholastic athletic contest or 17 competition has not been provided by the nonpublic school or 18 the charter school during the two immediately preceding school 19 years. 20 (2) The nonpublic school or charter school has not entered 21 into an agreement under section 280.13A with another school 22 district, nonpublic school, or charter school that provides 23 for the eligibility of students enrolled in the nonpublic 24 school or charter school to participate in the extracurricular 25 interscholastic athletic contest or competition that is being 26 provided by that school district, nonpublic school, or charter 27 school. 28 b. The board of directors of a school district shall allow 29 a student who resides within a contiguous school district, 30 and who is enrolled in a nonpublic school or a charter school 31 established pursuant to chapter 256E, subchapter I , to 32 participate in any extracurricular interscholastic athletic 33 contest or competition that is provided by the school district 34 pursuant to the terms of an agreement between the board of 35 -24- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 24/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ directors of the school district and the authorities in charge 1 of the nonpublic school or the governing board of the charter 2 school, as applicable, that provides for the eligibility of the 3 student, if all of the following criteria are satisfied: 4 (1) The extracurricular interscholastic athletic contest 5 or competition has not been provided by the nonpublic school 6 or charter school, or by the studentâs school district of 7 residence , during the two immediately preceding school years. 8 (2) The nonpublic school or charter school has not entered 9 into an agreement under section 280.13A with another school 10 district, nonpublic school, or charter school that provides 11 for the eligibility of students enrolled in the nonpublic 12 school or charter school to participate in the extracurricular 13 interscholastic athletic contest or competition that is being 14 provided by that school district, nonpublic school, or charter 15 school. 16 c. If the board of directors of a school district has 17 established a fee for the cost of a studentâs participation 18 in an extracurricular interscholastic athletic contest or 19 competition, a student who is enrolled in a nonpublic school 20 or a charter school established pursuant to chapter 256E, 21 subchapter I, and is participating in a contest or competition 22 at a public school pursuant to paragraph âaâ or âbâ , or the 23 studentâs parent or guardian, shall be responsible for the 24 payment of such fee. The amount of such fee shall not exceed 25 the amount of the fee the board of directors of the school 26 district has established for students who are enrolled in the 27 school district. 28 2. A student who is enrolled in a nonpublic school or a 29 charter school established pursuant to chapter 256E, subchapter 30 I, and is participating in a contest or competition at a public 31 school pursuant to subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ or âbâ , shall 32 participate under the same conditions as a student who is 33 enrolled in the school district, including meeting the school 34 districtâs student code of conduct requirements. 35 -25- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 25/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 3. A student who participates in an extracurricular 1 interscholastic athletic contest or competition pursuant 2 to this section shall be deemed to satisfy the residence 3 requirements for purposes of section 256.46 . 4 DIVISION IV 5 DRIVER EDUCATION 6 Sec. 55. Section 321.178, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 7 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8 c. (1) (a) Every public school district in Iowa shall 9 offer or make available to all students residing in the school 10 district, or Iowa students attending a nonpublic school or 11 receiving competent private instruction or independent private 12 instruction as defined in section 299A.1 , in the district, an 13 approved course in driver education. 14 (b) (i) Every public school district in Iowa shall offer 15 or make available to all Iowa students residing in the school 16 district who attend a charter school established pursuant 17 to chapter 256E, subchapter I, an approved course in driver 18 education pursuant to policies established by the public school 19 district. The charter school shall be responsible for the 20 payment of all of the school districtâs costs associated with 21 providing the approved course in driver education to such 22 students. 23 (ii) Every charter school established pursuant to chapter 24 256E, subchapter I, shall offer or make available to all 25 students attending the charter school an approved course in 26 driver education. 27 (c) The receiving district shall be the school district 28 responsible for making driver education available to a student 29 participating in open enrollment under section 282.18 . 30 (2) The courses may be offered at sites other than at the 31 public school or charter school , including nonpublic school 32 facilities within the public school districts. An approved 33 course offered during the summer months, on Saturdays, after 34 regular school hours during the regular terms or partly in one 35 -26- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 26/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ term or summer vacation period and partly in the succeeding 1 term or summer vacation period, as the case may be, shall 2 satisfy the requirements of this section to the same extent 3 as an approved course offered during the regular school hours 4 of the school term. A student who successfully completes and 5 obtains certification in an approved course in driver education 6 or an approved course in motorcycle education may, upon proof 7 of such fact, be excused from any field test which the student 8 would otherwise be required to take in demonstrating the 9 studentâs ability to operate a motor vehicle. A student shall 10 not be excused from any field test if a parent, guardian, 11 or instructor requests that a test be administered. A final 12 field test prior to a studentâs completion of an approved 13 course shall be administered by a person qualified to provide 14 street or highway driving instruction under paragraph âbâ , 15 subparagraph (2). 16 DIVISION V 17 CHARTER SCHOOL OPERATIONS 18 Sec. 56. Section 256.163, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 19 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 20 NEW PARAGRAPH . f. A charter school established pursuant to 21 chapter 256E, subchapter I. 22 Sec. 57. Section 256E.1, subsection 3, paragraph d, Code 23 2026, is amended to read as follows: 24 d. Accelerating student learning to prevent learning loss 25 during the COVID-19 pandemic and other significant disruptions 26 to student learning. 27 Sec. 58. Section 256E.6, subsections 2 and 6, Code 2026, are 28 amended to read as follows: 29 2. An initial charter school contract shall be granted for a 30 term of five school budget years , commencing the school budget 31 year in which the charter school opens . The charter school 32 contract shall include the beginning and ending dates of the 33 charter school contract term. An approved charter school may 34 delay its opening for a period of time not to exceed one school 35 -27- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 27/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ year in order to plan and prepare for the charter schoolâs 1 opening shall open on the first day of the school year that is 2 two school years immediately subsequent to the school year in 3 which the charter school contract is executed under subsection 4 1; provided, however, that the approved charter school may 5 open on the first day of the school year that is immediately 6 subsequent to the school year in which the charter school 7 contract is executed under subsection 1 if the approved charter 8 school demonstrates adequate preparation to the state board . 9 If the charter school requires an opening delay of more than 10 one school year two school years immediately subsequent to the 11 school year in which the charter school contract is executed 12 under subsection 1 , the charter school may request an extension 13 from the state board. 14 6. The contract may provide for requirements or conditions 15 to govern and monitor the start-up progress of an approved 16 charter school prior to the opening of the charter school 17 from the date the charter school contract is executed under 18 subsection 1 through the date the charter school opens under 19 subsection 2, including but not limited to conditions to ensure 20 that the charter school meets all building, health, safety, 21 insurance, and other legal requirements. 22 Sec. 59. Section 261E.8, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 23 2026, is amended to read as follows: 24 a. (1) Students from accredited nonpublic schools , and 25 students receiving competent private instruction or independent 26 private instruction under chapter 299A , and students from 27 charter schools established pursuant to chapter 256E may access 28 the program through the school district in which the accredited 29 nonpublic school , or private institution , or charter school is 30 located. 31 (2) Students from charter schools established pursuant to 32 chapter 256E that provide educational instruction and course 33 content that is delivered entirely over the internet may access 34 the program through the studentsâ school district of residence. 35 -28- LSB 5319XL (6) 91 jda/jh 28/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Sec. 60. APPLICABILITY. The following applies to charter 1 school contracts that are executed pursuant to section 256E.6, 2 subsection 1, on or after the effective date of this division 3 of this Act: 4 The section of this division of this Act amending section 5 256E.6. 6